Utah statutes.
63B-1-307.   Lease of facilities to state bodies -- Rental.
(1)  The authority and state bodies shall enter into leases or agreements for
the use and occupancy of any portion of any facility constructed or acquired
under this part.
(2)  The leases or agreements may provide for the operation, maintenance, and
insurance of the facility.
(3)  The leases and agreements shall provide that:
(a)  the rental to be paid annually by each state body to the authority for
the use and occupancy is in proportion to the space occupied in the facility
by that state body;
(b)  those rentals shall be in an amount sufficient to completely pay all
principal and interest on those obligations as they come due; and
(c)  those rentals may include:
(i)  the cost of maintenance, operation, and insurance of those facilities;
(ii)  the expenses of the authority in administering the facilities under this
part;
(iii)  amounts needed to provide reserves to secure obligations, to maintain,
repair, renovate, reconstruct, or replace those facilities; and
(iv)  any other reserves and funds that the authority considers necessary or
advisable in order to sell its obligations.
